Arkansas, session 2025, HB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-87-310(a) and (b), concerning the
prescriptive authority of an advanced practice registered nurse, are amended
to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing may grant a certificate of
prescriptive authority to an advanced practice registered nurse who:
(1) Submits proof of successful completion of an Arkansas State
Board of Nursing-approved advanced pharmacology course that shall include
preceptorial experience in the prescription of drugs, medicines, and
therapeutic devices; and
(2) Has either:
(A) A certificate of full independent practice authority
under § 17-87-314; or
(B) A collaborative practice agreement with a practicing
*JMB091*
01/14/2025 1:37:05 PM JMB091

HB1132
physician who is licensed under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-
201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., or a podiatrist
licensed by the Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine under § 17-96-101 et
seq., if employed by the podiatrist, and one (1) of the following healthcare
professionals who has training in scope, specialty, or expertise to that of
the advanced practice registered nurse on file with the Arkansas State Board
of Nursing:
(i) A practicing physician who is licensed under the
Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and
§ 17-95-401 et seq.;
(ii) A podiatrist licensed by the Arkansas Board of
Podiatric Medicine under § 17-96-101 et seq., if employed by the podiatrist;
or
(iii) An advanced practice registered nurse who has
a certificate of full independent practice authority under § 17-87-314.
(b)(1) An advanced practice registered nurse with a certificate of
prescriptive authority may receive and prescribe drugs, medicines, or
therapeutic devices appropriate to the advanced practice registered nurse's
area of practice in accordance with rules established by the Arkansas State
Board of Nursing.
(2)(A) An advanced practice registered nurse's prescriptive
authority shall extend only to drugs listed in Schedules III — V and, if
expressly authorized by the collaborative practice agreement, also to those
hydrocodone combination products reclassified from Schedule III to Schedule
II as of October 6, 2014.
(B) An advanced practice registered nurse's prescriptive
authority also extends to drugs listed in Schedule II if:
(i) The prescription is for an opioid and the
prescription is only for a five-day period or less; or
(ii)(a) The prescription is for a stimulant.
(b) A prescription for a stimulant shall meet
the following criteria:
(1) The prescription was originally
initiated by a physician;
(2) The physician has evaluated the
patient within six (6) months before the advanced practice registered nurse
01/14/2025 1:37:05 PM JMB091

HB1132
issues a prescription; and
(3) The prescription by the advanced
practice registered nurse is to treat the same condition as the original
prescription.
(B) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall adopt rules
for safe and appropriate prescribing of stimulant medications listed in
Schedule II.
(3)(A) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing shall promptly adopt
rules applicable to an advanced practice registered nurse that are consistent
with the Arkansas State Medical Board's rules governing the prescription of
dangerous drugs and controlled substances.
(B) Before approval of the Arkansas State Board of
Nursing's rules, the Arkansas State Medical Board shall review the proposed
rules and verify that the proposed rules are consistent with the Arkansas
State Medical Board's rules concerning the prescription of dangerous drugs
and controlled substances.




















01/14/2025 1:37:05 PM JMB091